Hawaii statutes.
[§198D-7] Examination of legal issues. The
department, in consultation with the attorney general, shall examine legal
issues relating to trails and accesses. The legal issues examined shall
include:

(1) Theories, options, and doctrines by which trails
and accesses may be placed into or retained in public use;

(2) The validity and feasibility of dedication
requirements to obtain public use of trails and accesses;

(3) The extent of liability exposure of the State,
counties, and private landowners when allowing trails and accesses under their
respective jurisdictions to be used by the general public; and

(4) Strategies to reduce or limit the liability
exposure of the State, counties, and private landowners in order to promote
public use of trails and accesses under their respective jurisdictions which
are closed to the general public. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next